src/fst/morphology/stems/adverbs.lexc
!! # Meänkieli adverbs

!! This file documents [the file for Meänkieli adverbs](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-fit/blob/main/src/fst/stems/adverbs.lexc).

!! The first part of the file adds tags, and the second lists the adverbs.

!! ## The tags:

LEXICON advx !!≈ * @CODE@ Still not checked, hence the x
+Adv: K ; !!≈ * @CODE@ 

LEXICON adv !!≈ * @CODE@  checked
+Adv: K ; !!≈ * @CODE@ 


LEXICON advkk !!≈ * @CODE@  checked and with geminate clitic
+Adv: KK ;

LEXICON advpx
+Adv: K ;
+Adv+PxSg3:%>ns^A K ;

!! ## The adverbs themselves (some 1200)

LEXICON Adverb  !!≈ * @CODE@ 
likele adv ;
vuona adv ;
pitkälti adv ;
justhiinsa adv ;
justhiins adv ; ! xxx?
online adv ;
yllä adv ;
niin adv ; !!≈ * @CODE@ 
niinkö adv ; !!≈ * @CODE@ 
nimittäin adv ; !!≈ * @CODE@ 
liian adv ; !!≈ * @CODE@ 
piian adv ; !! ...
siks adv ;
takapäin adv ;
myös adv ;
miten adv ;
myöhemin adv ;
eniten adv ;
tällöin adv ;
ohi adv ;
kauas adv ;
kauan adv ;
paljo adv ;
ennenku adv ;
ennenko adv ;
muumuassa adv ;
oikeasthaan adv ;
mitenkä adv ;
oikhein adv ; !CHECK EK
oiken adv ;
oikheen+Err/Orth:oikeen adv ; ! xxx ???
oikheen adv ;
oikhen adv ;
mukana adv ;
täysin adv ;
taas adv ;
just adv ;
enemän adv ;
silloin adv ; ! xxx?
sillon adv ;
kuinka adv ;
nyt adv ;
nytten adv ; !CHECK
jo adv ;
ennen adv ;
ushein adv ;
ulos adv ;
sisäle adv ;
kotoa adv ;
huonosti advkk ;
villisti advkk ;
puhthaasti advkk ;
näin adv ;
parastaikaa advx ;
peräsukkaa advx ;
rintaa advx ;
alvaria advx ;
uhka advx ;
saakka advx ;
kunka advx ;
muka adv ;
mukhaan adv ;
nojala advx ;
lepala advx ;
salassa advx ;
veitala advx ;
halvala advx ;
toela advx ;
valpheila advx ;
hajotuksila advx ;
marsittamalla advx ;
uposalla advx ;
rukatuksella advx ;
sokkosilla advx ;
lengolla advx ;
longola advx ;
kothoola advx ;
tupla advx ;
jama advx ;
kuulema advx ;
kaukaa advx ;
loppuvuosina advx ;
ulkopuolele adv ;
ulkopuolela adv ;
ulkopuolelta adv ;
ulkona advx ;
traasuna advx ;
ekstra advx ;
korkeinthaansa advx ;
hajahlaansa advx ;
suohraansa advx ;
paikalansa advx ;
parhailansa advx ;
veitallansa advx ;
iholansa advx ;
toisinansa advx ;
sijaltansa advx ;
sialensa advx ;
polvilens advx ; !CHECK
omilupinensa advx ;
alvarhiinsa advx ;
sekhaan advx ;
poikkiviassa advx ;
nassakassa advx ;
paistosuolassa advx ;
laskuviinassa advx ;
persetorassa advx ;
lopsassa advx ;
muassa advx ;
poijessa advx ;
kuoruksessa advx ;
keskuvessa advx ;
poissa advx ;
vajoksissa advx ;
laiskuksissa advx ;
kumaruksissa advx ;
hoornatissa advx ;
lumpuissa advx ;
vahinkossa advx ;
kumossa advx ;
kunnossa advx ;
kasossa advx ;
tuossa advx ;
koukussa advx ;
vaikkuurussa advx ;
kahtaalta advx ;
pikuelta advx ;
kosolta advx ;
katalasta advx ;
harvakheesta advx ;
kaikenlaista advx ;
hullusta advx ;
kohtaamatta advx ;
kautta advx ;
seuraava advx ;
vuorosauva advx ;
tavattomasta advx ;
painamarajale advx ;
suunile advx ;
alle advx ;
sisäle advx ;
toishaanne advx ;
vasite advx ;
nyh advx ;
puhki advx ;
poikki advx ;
olletikki advx ;
arvatenki advx ;
kuiten advx ;
ainaski advx ;
kaali advx ;
parahiltani advx ;
kaikkityyni advx ;
enämpää advx ;
myötyri advx ;
loijomaksi advx ;
suomeksi advx ;
viimiseksi advx ;
parahiksi advx ;
kenkiksi advx ;
kylliksi advx ;
suoriksi advx ;
ruottiksi advx ;
traasuksi advx ;
lisäksi advx ;
täysi advx ;
vasiti advx ;
irti advx ;
asti adv ;
laupihaasti advkk ;
vuonkhaasti advkk ;
vaphaasti advkk ;
reiphaasti advkk ;
riethaasti advkk ;
hithaasti advkk ;
mahikkaasti advkk ;
kauheasti advkk ;
useasti advkk ;
lujasti advkk ;
tarkasti advkk ;
nuukasti advkk ;
puolialasti advkk ;
kamalasti advkk ;
tuplasti advkk ;
useamasti advkk ;
erilaisemasti advkk ;
julmasti advkk ;
kummasti advkk ;
isomasti advkk ;
rajattomasti advkk ;
vaivattomasti advkk ;
luvattomasti advkk ;
mahottomasti advkk ;
ehottomasti advkk ;
armottomasti advkk ;
varmasti advkk ;
pakanasti advkk ;
itarasti advkk ;
viljasasti advkk ;
lukusasti advkk ;
viljavasti advkk ;
mukavasti advkk ;
herratavasti advkk ;
mahtavasti advkk ;
luultavasti advkk ;
herrattavasti advkk ;
arvattavasti advkk ;
juolevasti advkk ;
kivasti advkk ;
kovasti advkk ;
varovasti advkk ;
kahesti advkk ;
kaikesti advkk ;
kolmesti advkk ;
monesti advkk ;
toesti advkk ;
suuresti advkk ;
vakasesti advkk ;
pikasesti advkk ;
samallaisesti advkk ;
ylheisesti advkk ;
limapuohleisesti advkk ;
lihalisesti advkk ;
pohjalisesti advkk ;
persoonalisesti advkk ;
veitalisesti advkk ;
ivalisesti advkk ;
tähelisesti advkk ;
vastonmielisesti advkk ;
järjelisesti advkk ;
nimelisesti advkk ;
lailisesti advkk ;
leiilisesti advkk ;
luonolisesti advkk ;
joltisesti advkk ;
joutisesti advkk ;
erityisesti advkk ;
lyhykäisesti advkk ;
lehmämäisesti advkk ;
vastonpäisesti advkk ;
melkosesti advkk ;
vapaaehtosesti advkk ;
leutosesti advkk ;
tavalisesti advkk ;
äkäsesti advkk ;
vastahakosesti advkk ;
äärimäisesti advkk ;
kylläsesti advkk ;
uuesti advkk ;
uuesthaan advkk ;
tovesti advkk ;
täyesti advkk ;
tiekhoisti advkk ;
toisti advkk ;
knapisti advkk ;
krouvisti advkk ;
kolosti advkk ;
hienosti advkk ;
isosti advkk ;
ouvosti advkk ;
hullusti advkk ;
lamusti advkk ;
hopusti advkk ;
pirusti advkk ;
paksusti advkk ;
kessusti advkk ;
vasitusti advkk ;
kirotusti advkk ;
kiirhuusti advkk ;
keheästi advkk ;
vinkeästi advkk ;
tärkeästi advkk ;
triiskeästi advkk ;
liepeästi advkk ;
kipeästi advkk ;
lempeästi advkk ;
vireästi advkk ;
keveästi advkk ;
pitkästi advkk ;
liiemästi advkk ;
liijemästi advkk ;
vissimästi advkk ;
äärettömästi advkk ;
järkevästi advkk ;
kätevästi advkk ;
tiettävästi advkk ;
lauti advx ;
lyhtheittäm advx ;
ennenaikhaan advx ;
sunkhaan advx ;
kukhaan advx ;
laihiimilhaan advx ;
myötävaarhaan advx ;
vasthaan advx ;
piijaan advx ;
varhmaan advx ;
puolilaattihan advx ;
piijan advx ;
jalan advx ;
kerran advx ;
siihheen advx ;
hiljasheen advx ;
suhtheen advx ;
taltheen advx ;
etukätheen advx ;
iltapuohleen advx ;
sangen advx ;
ylinulkkujen advx ;
eilen advx ;
viimen advx ;
samanaikhainen advx ;
vetokainen advx ;
kuuluvainen advx ;
alinen advx ;
teelusikalinen advx ;
hinkilinen advx ;
tynnyrilinen advx ;
lehellinen advx ;
menheenkesälinen advx ;
laihansorttinen advx ;
keskimäinen advx ;
kokonen advx ;
arvonen advx ;
yhäksen advx ;
täkösen advx ;
lähiten advx ;
virreimiten advx ;
pikimiten advx ;
lyhimmiten advx ;
vasiten advx ;
väkisten advx ;
liketysten advx ;
jouten advx ;
myöten advx ;
piiain advx ;
kalpattain advx ;
tuskittain advx ;
lusikoittain advx ;
osittain advx ;
laumottain advx ;
oikein advx ;
ussein advx ;
kalpattein advx ;
inthin advx ;
yhtheenlaihiin advx ;
jälkhiin advx ;
hoornathiin advx ;
leikin advx ;
mielinkielin advx ;
usseen advx ;
tarkoin advx ;
takasin advx ;
lauvantaisin advx ;
kotosin advx ;
minnekäsin advx ;
myötäsin advx ;
nuin+Err/Orth:noin advx ;
näin advx ;
taappäin advx ;
likipittäin advx ;
millon advx ;
ehoton advx ;
mänthyyn advx ;
vastapäihvään advx ;
entisilhään advx ;
ennesthään advx ;
ylön advx ;
jo advx ;
valinko advx ;
lähes advx ;
koppinens advx ;
ylös advx ;
pahentunnu advx ;
äkkiä advx ;
sieltä advx ;
vielä adv ;
perilä advx ;
leikkisillä advx ;
läämällä advx ;
nyrräpäälä advx ;
ensinä advx ;
läsnä advx ;
ikipäivänä advx ;
tykönä adv ;
tykösti adv ;
pitkälensä advx ;
mielelä advx ;
sölälänsä advx ;
päiväsiltänsä advx ;
yhessä advx ;
keskelen advx ;
fitterissä advx ;
körrösissä advx ;
syltyssä advx ;
tyrmässä advx ;
tässä advx ;
mössössä advx ;
ensistä advx ;
myötä advx ;
täkempää advx ;
tykö advpx ;
tyköä adv ;
tavalisesti advkk ;
kehnosti advkk ;
säänölisesti advkk ;
varovaisesti advkk ;
ilkeästi advkk ;
selvästi advkk ;
rauhalisesti advkk ;
kulttuurihistuurialisesti advkk ;
hammashykienisti advkk ;
vakavasti advkk ;
testi advkk ;
yhteisesti advkk ;
ittesti advkk ;
ilmhaisesti advkk ;
helposti advkk ;
erikoisesti advkk ;
aktiivisesti advkk ;
aiemmin adv ;
poies adv ;
piikkisain:piikkisai adv ;
matoittain adv ;
myöhemmin+Err/Orth:myöhemmin adv ;
aikasemmin adv ;
kuukausittain adv ;
joten+Err/Orth:joten adv ; !NB finska
näes adv ;
kohin adv ;
jonneki adv ;
alta adv ;
totta adv ;
likemäksi adv ;
etheen adv ;
etelheen+Err/Orth:etelheen adv ; !NB finskanpassning
etelhän:etelhän adv ;
tänäpänä adv ;
tänhään adv ;
mielelhään adv ;
jouten:jouten adv ; !  ;
aijemin adv ;
aiemin adv ;
vähintäns adv ;
vähinthään adv ;
vähinthänsä adv ;
vähhiinthääns adv ; !CHECK
vähhiinthään adv ;
yhten adv ;
yhten+Err/Orth:yhteen adv ; !CHECK EK
yhthen adv ;
yhthen+Err/Orth:yhtheen adv ; !CHECK EK
kaikkialla adv ;
vaakasuunta:vaakasuunta adv ;
illemalla:illemalla adv ;
päivemällä:päivemällä adv ;
koska:koska adv ;
koskas:koskas adv ;
ilmi:ilmi adv ;
tänäpäivänä adv ;
näes:näes advx ;
